Hawaii statutes.
§338-10 Late determination of the cause of
death. If the cause of death cannot be determined within three days, the
certification of its cause may be filed after the prescribed period, but the
attending physician or coroner's physician shall notify in writing the local
agent of the department of health of the district in which the death occurred
of the reason for late filing, in order that a permit for the disposition of
the body may be issued.

As used in this section, "late" means
more than three days after the date of death. [L 1949, c 327, §14; RL 1955,
§57-13; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-10; am L 1973, c 17, §7; am L 1997,
c 305, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next